Rhode Island statutes. Title 19 Financial Institutions
Chapter 3.1 Trust Powers

19-3.1-1.
Scope.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to any financial institution:

Authorized by its agreement to form to exercise trust powers;

Permitted to exercise such powers by laws of this state applicable to that financial institution on or before December 31, 1994; and

To any bank or trust company duly organized under the laws of and carrying on business in another state that has established a trust branch office in this state subject to the provisions of §

19-3.1-6

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41; P.L. 2003, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 178, § 2.

19-3.1-2.
Power to hold and invest assets.

Every financial institution subject to this chapter shall have the power:

To receive and hold money in trust, or upon any terms and conditions agreed upon, and to allow the interest upon it;

To receive and hold money, bonds, notes, mortgages, certificates of stock, and other securities, held in a fiduciary capacity. Interest on funds received and held may be paid at any rates obtained or agreed upon;

To receive and execute all trusts that may be created or transferred to it by the decree of any court, and to receive all funds that may be deposited with it by an order of any court, upon any terms agreed upon; and every court into which funds may be paid by parties to any proceeding therein, or may be brought by order or judgment, may by order direct the funds to be deposited with the financial institution. The financial institution shall not be required to accept or execute any trust without its written consent;

In the absence of an express provision to the contrary in the instrument, judgment, decree, or order creating a trust or other fiduciary relationship, to purchase for the fiduciary estate, or to advise others, including any investment company or investment trust, to purchase, directly from underwriters of distributors or in the secondary market, bonds or other securities that are underwritten or distributed by the financial institution or an affiliate or by any syndicate that includes the financial institution or an affiliate and securities of any investment company or investment trust for which the financial institution or any affiliate acts as adviser, distributor, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, manager, shareholder servicing agent, or custodian in return for reasonable compensation; provided, however, that:

Nothing in this subsection shall affect the degree of prudence required of fiduciaries generally under the common law of the state; and

Any bonds or securities so purchased shall have sufficient liquidity and quality to satisfy the principles of fiduciary investment; provided, further, that:

Any financial institution purchasing bonds or other securities underwritten or distributed by the financial institution or an affiliate or by any syndicate that includes the financial institution or an affiliate shall, in any written communication or account statement reflecting the purchase, disclose the fact that it or an affiliate may have an interest in the underwriting or distribution of the bonds or securities and any capacities in which it or an affiliate acts for the issuer of the securities; and

Any financial institution purchasing securities of any investment company or investment trust for which the financial institution or any affiliate acts as advisor, distributor, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, manager, shareholder servicing agent, or custodian shall disclose the provision of the stated services, and the receipt of compensation for services, annually by mailing a prospectus, statement, or letter describing the services to the last known address of each person to whom statements for the fiduciary estate are rendered.

For the purposes of this section, the term “financial institution” shall include insured-deposit-taking institutions duly organized under the laws of the United States and empowered to exercise trust powers.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41; P.L. 1995, ch. 266, § 1; P.L. 1998, ch. 441, § 11.

19-3.1-2.1.
Permitted investments.

In the absence of any express provisions to the contrary, whenever any general statute, special act, regulation, trust indenture, will, or other instrument governing the investment powers of trustees directs, requires, authorizes, or permits investment in United States government obligations, a trustee may invest in and hold these obligations, either directly or in the form of interests in an investment company or investment trust registered under the Investment Company Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. § 80a-1 et seq., the portfolio of which is limited to United States government obligations and to repurchase agreements fully collateralized by these obligations, and that is rated in the top rating category of any nationally recognized rating services.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 268, § 1.

19-3.1-3.
Financial institution acting as fiduciary.

A financial institution subject to this chapter shall also have power to accept and execute all of these trusts, and to hold in trust all property, of every description, as may be committed to it by any person or persons, or by any corporation, or by any court of this state or of the United States; and also to accept and execute the office and appointment of executors, administrators, custodians, conservators, guardians of estates, assignees, or receivers of any kind or nature whatever, whether that office or appointment be conferred or made by any person or persons, or by any court of probate or other court; and any court of probate in this state is hereby empowered, in its discretion, to appoint the financial institution as executor, administrator, custodian, conservator and guardian of the estate of any person within its jurisdiction, subject however, to the provisions of §

33-8-8

, and provided, that the financial institution may, upon the petition of the surviving spouse, be appointed administrator or custodian upon the estate of a spouse dying intestate; provided, further, that the financial institution shall not be authorized to act in any of the foregoing offices until its acceptance in writing of the appointment shall be filed and recorded in the probate court in which the appointment shall be made.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41.

19-3.1-4.
Fiduciary bond given by financial institution.

In all cases in which a financial institution shall receive and accept appointment as executor, administrator, custodian, conservator, or guardian of any estate, the financial institution shall give bond in the same manner as provided by law in the case of individuals so appointed. The financial institution shall not be required to give surety upon any bond unless some person pecuniarily interested in the estate, before the bond is given, files a written request, in the court of probate making the appointment, that bond with surety be given, in which case the court may require the financial institution to give bond with surety or sureties satisfactory to the court in the manner provided by law in the case of individuals appointed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41.

19-3.1-5.
Financial institutions administering burial grounds.

Every financial institution subject to this chapter shall have the power to accept and hold property given by will or otherwise transferred to it in trust for the care and preservation of burial grounds that have been in existence for at least fifty (50) years before the creation of the trust and of the stones, monuments, fences, and other structures thereon, and to administer and apply the trust property in accordance with the terms of the trust; and shall likewise have the power to accept and hold property given to it by will or otherwise transferred to it for the purposes listed in this section and administer the property in accordance with the terms of the trust. Executors may transfer to any financial institution any legacy given for any of the purposes listed in this section and the transfer shall be a valid discharge for the legacy. Trusts for any of the purposes listed in this section are hereby declared to be charitable trusts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41.

19-3.1-6.
Foreign banks and trust companies — Agent to receive process.

No person shall exercise any of the powers conferred exclusively upon financial institutions, except that a trust company duly organized under the laws of, and carrying on business in, another state, or a national banking association located in another state, may act as trustee under any written instrument in which it is named as trustee, or may be appointed as trustee of any trust by any court of competent jurisdiction of this state, or may be appointed by any probate court of this state as administrator, administrator de bonis non, administrator with the will annexed, guardian of estates, or conservator, or as executor of any will in which it is named as executor, if financial institutions or national banking associations located in this state are permitted to act as trustee, administrator, administrator de bonis non, administrator with the will annexed, guardian of estates, conservator, or executor under similar conditions in the state where the trust company is located. The trust company or national banking association located in another state, as the case may be, shall execute and file in the office of the director, or the director’s designee, a written instrument appointing the director, or the director’s designee, in his or her name of office its true and lawful attorney upon whom all writs and other legal process may be served in any legal proceeding relating to its conduct as trustee, administrator, administrator de bonis non, administrator with the will annexed, guardian, conservator, or executor or affecting any property held by it under the trusts or the will or the appointment, with the same effect as if it were located in this state and had been lawfully served with process.

Upon obtaining the consent of the director, or the director’s designee, a bank or trust company duly organized under the laws of, and carrying on business in another state, may establish a trust branch or branches within this state if the law of the other state authorizes the bank or trust company to exercise trust powers; provided that, in the case of an out-of-state bank or trust company, the law of the state in which it is principally located authorizes under conditions not substantially more restrictive than those imposed by the laws of this state, as determined by the director, or the director’s designee, a financial institution to establish a trust branch in that state. The director, or the director’s designee, shall approve an application for a trust branch if the applicant has satisfied the standards and followed the procedures set forth in this title for the establishment of branches for financial institutions in addition to the requirements of this subsection. The bank or trust company located in another state shall execute and file in the office of the director, or the director’s designee, a written instrument appointing the director, or the director’s designee, in his or her name of office its true and lawful attorney upon whom all writs and other legal process may be served in any legal proceeding relating to trust activities conducted in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41; P.L. 2003, ch. 174, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 178, § 2.

19-3.1-7.
Assets equal to capital stock as pledged — Preference over other creditors.

A portion of the assets of every financial institution subject to this chapter, equal in value to the par value of its capital stock, shall stand pledged, and shall be taken and considered as the security required by law, for the faithful performance of the institution’s duties as trustee, executor, administrator, custodian, conservator, guardian, assignee or receiver, except as otherwise provided, and for the deposits made by executors, administrators, custodians, conservators, assignees, or receivers, trustees, or guardians. In case of loss, any person beneficially entitled to these estates, and any executor, administrator, custodian, conservator, assignee, or receiver, trustee, or guardian making the deposits shall be first indemnified in full from the amounts so pledged in preference to all other creditors.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41.

19-3.1-8.
Deposits by financial institutions with general treasurer.

Every financial institution subject to this chapter shall deposit with the general treasurer an amount that is at all times equal in value to twenty percent (20%) of the entire capital stock of the financial institution, in:

Bonds, of at least a double A (“AA”) rating or equivalent, of this state or of any state or of the United States;

Bonds, rated at least double A (“AA”) or equivalent, notes, or other financial obligations of any town or city in this state;

Any securities of the classes in which the sinking fund commission of this state is authorized to invest the moneys received by it;

First mortgages on improved real estate in this state of the class required for financial institution investments;

Mortgages insured and debentures issued by the federal housing administration; or

Obligations of national mortgage associations.

These investments shall be held by the general treasurer as an additional security for the faithful performance by the financial institution of its duties as trustee, executor, custodian, conservator, guardian, assignee, or receiver, and also as an additional security for the repayment of deposits with the financial institution by executors, administrators, custodians, conservators, guardians, assignees, or receivers, or trustees on special agreement, made to exonerate the depositors under this title from personal liability to the estates on account of which these deposits were made. The parties intended to be secured by the deposits shall, in case of loss, be first fully indemnified out of the deposit, in preference to all other creditors of the financial institution. However, whenever the deposit or any part of it consists of mortgages on real estate, the financial institution so depositing it shall execute an assignment of the deposit and of the debts secured by it in favor of the general treasurer, in trust, for the uses and purposes listed in this section. No financial institution shall accept or assume to perform any of the trust duties mentioned in this section or receive any deposits from any of the trustees until the deposit has been made. If the security required by this section is one that is maintained in the Federal Reserve book entry system or the depository trust company book entry system or any similar entity, then the financial institution required to make the deposit shall designate the general treasurer as the pledgee of the security and provide written notification to the general treasurer identifying the security.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41.

19-3.1-9.
Certificates of deposit — Interest and income — Substitution of securities.

Upon the receipt by the general treasurer of the securities from the financial institution, the general treasurer shall give to the financial institution a certificate stating the securities and amount of each. The general treasurer shall at all times pay over to the financial institution any interest received upon the deposited securities, and shall at all times permit the institution, by its treasurer or other authorized agent, to examine the securities, to receive all coupons on the securities as they shall mature, and to collect for the use of the financial institution all interest due on the securities. The general treasurer shall also permit the financial institution to retire any deposited securities on substituting other securities of the classes mentioned above, to an amount that the market value of the whole deposit shall not be less than the amount required by this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41.

19-3.1-10.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of this chapter to any person or circumstances is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter that can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1995, ch. 82, § 41.